Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2607
Suspension, revocation, or refusal
to renew registration.

(1)
The Secretary of State may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a registration
for conduct that would have justified denial of registration under subsection
(2) of section 48-2606.

(2) The Secretary of
State may deny, suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a certificate of registration
or licensure only after proper notice and an opportunity for a hearing. The
Administrative Procedure Act applies to the Nebraska Uniform Athlete Agents
Act.

Laws 2009, LB292, § 7.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.